Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3758
Fee; when prohibited.

The fee imposed by section 2-3755 shall not apply to the sale of dry beans to the federal government for ultimate use or consumption by the people of the United States when the State of Nebraska is prohibited from imposing such fee by the Constitution of the United States and laws enacted pursuant thereto.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 24.